New Jersey, session 222, A5136.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Pathway means a physical route or supporting structure to carry or guide electrical wiring or cables. Raceway means a channel, conduit, or track designed to hold and protect a pathway or other wiring system, and shall be four inches and design to accommodate not less than two broadband providers. b. A developer of any new residential construction for which an application for a construction permit has not been declared complete by the enforcing agency before the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be required to provide notice to the majority incumbent local exchange carrier of the area requesting installation of raceways to be available for deployment of cables to allow for physical broadband connections to the new residential construction. Installation of raceways shall occur during the normal course of trenching or utility installation associated with the development. c.     A developer of any new residential construction may enter into an agreement with any other party, including but not limited to any telecommunications utility, to lease or purchase a preexisting raceway in order to meet the requirements of this section, provided, however, that no such agreement shall grant exclusive use or control of the raceway in a manner that would prevent access by at least two broadband providers in a non-discriminatory manner. d.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall adopt, pursuant to section 5 of the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-123) and the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations establishing standards for the design, installation, and adequacy of raceways for new residential construction, including minimum sizing and access requirements sufficient to support multiple broadband providers. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.